Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,114
Dealer or manufacturer license plates;
fee.

(1) Any licensed dealer or manufacturer may, upon payment
of a fee of thirty dollars, make an application, on a form approved by the
Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board, to the county treasurer of
the county in which his or her place of business is located for a certificate
and one dealer license plate for the type of motor vehicle or trailer the
dealer has been authorized by the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing
Board to sell and demonstrate. One additional dealer license plate may be
procured for the type of motor vehicle or trailer the dealer has sold during
the last previous period of October 1 through September 30 for each twenty
motor vehicles or trailers sold at retail during such period or one additional
dealer license plate for each thirty motor vehicles or trailers sold at wholesale
during such period, but not to exceed a total of five additional dealer license
plates in the case of motor vehicles or trailers sold at wholesale, or, in
the case of a manufacturer, for each ten motor vehicles or trailers actually
manufactured or assembled within the state within the last previous period
of October 1 through September 30 for a fee of fifteen dollars each.

(2) Dealer or manufacturer license plates shall display, in addition
to the registration number, the letters DLR.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 114;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 69.